District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.57

Repealed

Articles of amendment — Procedure for filing.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 203, ch. 269, § 57
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 11
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-923a.
1981 Ed., § 29-357.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.57.